New Jersey, session 222, A2160.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Passaic Valley Sewerage Commissioners shall maintain minutes of all meetings and public hearings by the commissioners.  No action may be taken by the commissioners unless the action is taken at a meeting or public hearing for which minutes have been provided. b.    A true copy of the minutes of every meeting or public hearing of the commissioners shall be delivered under the certification of the commission to the Governor.  No action taken at the meeting or public hearing by the commissioners shall have force or effect until 15 days after the copy of the minutes have been so delivered, unless during this 15-day period the Governor shall approve in writing the minutes, or any part thereof, in which case the action shall become effective upon approval.  If, within that 15-day period, the Governor returns a copy of the minutes with the Governors veto of any action taken by the commissioners or any member thereof at the meeting or public hearing, the action shall be null and void and of no effect.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the last day of the 15-day period shall be a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, then the 15-day period shall be deemed extended to the next business day. The powers conferred in this subsection upon the Governor shall be exercised with due regard for the rights of the holders of bonds, notes, or other obligations of the commissioners at any time outstanding, and nothing in, or done pursuant to, this subsection shall in any way limit, restrict, or alter the obligation or powers of the commissioners or any representative or officer of the commissioners to carry out and perform in every detail each and every covenant, agreement, or contract at any time made or entered into by or on behalf of the commissioners with respect to its bonds, notes, or other obligations or for the benefit, protection, or security of the holders thereof. c.    After the review period required pursuant to subsection b. of this section has elapsed, if the Governor has not notified the commissioners of a veto of the minutes, the minutes and any action taken at the meeting or public hearing to which the minutes correspond shall take effect. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.